South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3207.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 25, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-25-112. A professional certificate issued by the State Board of Education is permanent unless revoked or suspended and is not subject to renewal. No teacher may be required to renew a professional certificate issued by the board. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2026. ----XX----